Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.280

Personnel service fund—Created—Charges to agencies, payment—Use.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1) The personnel service fund is created in the state treasury, to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500 and 41.06.530.

(2) The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be credited to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper fund or appropriation of the recipient of such services no longer than on a quarterly basis. Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be made according to the state administrative and accounting manual (SAAM) to the state treasurer and deposited in the personnel service fund.

(3) The office of financial management may use the personnel service fund to administer an employee transit pass program and other employment benefits. The office of financial management must bill state agencies for the total cost of administering the program and payments received from agencies must be deposited in the personnel service fund.

[ 2023 c 435 s 2; 2022 c 157 s 12; 2021 c 334 s 964; 2019 c 415 s 957; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 919; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 968; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 967; 2013 c 251 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 419; 1993 c 379 s 309; 1993 c 281 s 34; 1987 c 248 s 4; 1984 c 7 s 45; 1982 c 167 s 13; 1963 c 215 s 1; 1961 c 1 s 28 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Residual balance of funds—2013 c 251: "Any residual balance of funds remaining in the public printing revolving account repealed by section 13 of this act on June 30, 2013, shall be transferred to the enterprise services account. Any residual balance of funds remaining in the Puyallup tribal settlement account repealed by section 13 of this act on June 30, 2013, shall be transferred to the motor vehicle fund. Any residual balance of funds remaining in any other account abolished in this act on June 30, 2013, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund." [ 2013 c 251 s 17.]

Effective date—2013 c 251: "Except for section 4 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2013." [ 2013 c 251 s 18.]

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 379: See notes following RCW 28B.10.029.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Legislative findings—Purpose—1987 c 248: See note following RCW 41.04.362.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.